California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
For the purpose of doing work or acquiring rights-of-way therefor, the board may authorize a contract to be entered into between the district and the political subdivision or agency of the state with which it proposes to cooperate, and full power and authority is granted to the city, county, joint highway, or other district, or the Department of Transportation, to enter into the contracts for cooperative work, construction, or purchase of rights-of-way, in such a manner and upon such apportionment of the cost thereof as may be agreed upon between them. For this purpose, the contracting parties may designate engineers, county surveyors, or other necessary officials or employees to take charge of the particular work, and provide for the payment of the cost of the work out of funds contributed by the contracting parties. The plans and specifications for the work shall be approved by both of the contracting parties, and the work may be carried out by either one of the contracting parties as the agent of the other, or it may be carried out under the joint management of both of the contracting parties. 

Any project undertaken by a district alone, or in cooperation with any of the agencies mentioned, may be accomplished by federal aid under rules which may be prescribed by the federal agencies involved.

Any work may extend across, through, or within any city, county, joint highway district, or other district, if the work is an extension of an approach to a bridge operated by the district and connects the bridge as a main or alternate route with state highways or other through routes leading to or from the bridge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

27173.8.

Every purchase or contract made in violation of the competitive bidding requirements of this part shall be void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1472.)
-------------------------------------------

27174.

The district may contract with the State for the construction, repair or relocation of highways or approaches to any structure or improvement maintained or operated by it and may collect tolls for the use of such structure or improvement to pay any obligation to the State, incurred under the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1227.)
-------------------------------------------

27174.1.

(a) The district may adopt rules and regulations not inconsistent with the Vehicle Code for the control of traffic on any facility of travel constructed by the district, to aid and ensure the safe and orderly flow of traffic, and shall, so far as practicable, notify the public of those rules and regulations by signs on the facility of travel. The district may also adopt rules and regulations pertaining to parking areas in conjunction with any facilities of travel constructed or maintained by the district. The district may also adopt rules and regulations governing the use of all modes of transportation owned, operated, or maintained by the district.

(b) The district may enforce any rule, regulation, or ordinance adopted by the board of directors of the district pursuant to this section or subdivision (a) of Section 21113 of the Vehicle Code and relating to stopping or parking of vehicles by the issuance of notices of parking violation and notices of delinquent parking violation in the manner prescribed by Article 3 (commencing with Section 40200) of Chapter 1 of Division 17 of the Vehicle Code. Notices of parking violation and notices of delinquent parking violation may be issued by those employees of the district authorized by rule, regulation, or ordinance of the district.

(c) The district may enforce any rule, regulation, or ordinance relating to toll evasion adopted by the board of directors of the district pursuant to this section or subdivision (a) of Section 40250 of the Vehicle Code by the issuance of notices of toll evasion violation and notices of delinquent toll evasion in the manner prescribed by Article 4 (commencing with Section 40250) of Chapter 1 of Division 17 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

27174.2.

(a) Every person who, without permission of the board or its authorized officers or agents, climbs upon any railing, cable, suspender rope, tower, or superstructure of any district toll bridge, or otherwise trespasses on any portion of the bridge that is not intended for public use, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(b) Every person who trespasses on district property other than that referred to in subdivision (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) If the court grants probation to any person punished under subdivision (a), in addition to any other terms or conditions imposed by the court, the court shall impose as a condition of that probation that the person perform not less than 40 hours and not more than 160 hours of community service in the county in which the violation occurred. To the extent practicable, the service shall involve work in homeless shelters, programs designed for the care of drug abuse, and hospices. The service shall be performed during a time that does not interfere with the person’s school attendance or employment.

(d) Any person convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) of this section shall reimburse the bridge district for costs resulting from the violation. The court shall consider the costs to the bridge district and shall prorate the defendant’s share of the costs based on the defendant’s responsibility for the acts and in accordance with the defendant’s ability to pay, as the court deems appropriate in the interest of justice.

(e) This section does not apply to persons engaged in the operation, maintenance, or repair of a bridge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 379, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

27174.3.

Every person who stands in the roadway or on the sidewalk of any district toll bridge, or the approaches thereto, for the purpose of soliciting a ride from the driver of any vehicle is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1731.)
-------------------------------------------

27175.

The district shall cause to be published and made available to the public at the toll gates of any facilities of travel constructed by the district, copies of those traffic laws and rules and regulations particularly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1350.)
-------------------------------------------

27176.

Violation of any rules or regulations provided for in Section 27174.1, notice of which has been given by a sign on the facility of travel constructed by the district is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1731.)
-------------------------------------------

27177.

The California Highway Patrol shall have the authority and it shall be its duty to provide for proper and adequate policing of all facilities of travel constructed by the district, to insure the enforcement thereon of the Vehicle Code and of any other law relating to the use and operation of vehicles upon highways or vehicular crossings as defined in the Vehicle Code, and of the rules and regulations adopted by the board of directors of the district in respect to facilities of travel and parking areas, and to cooperate with the district, to the end that such facilities of travel and parking areas be operated at all times in such manner as to carry traffic efficiently. This authority of the California Highway Patrol is exclusive except as to the authority conferred upon the district by Section 27174.1 in respect to those facilities of travel or parking areas.

All required accident reports and supplemental reports, and all other reports made to the California Highway Patrol by any peace officer, member of the California Highway Patrol, or other employees of the Department of Motor Vehicles and California Highway Patrol relative to accidents and incidents occurring on property of a bridge and highway district shall be immediately available for the confidential use of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 50, Sec. 4.   Effective March 22, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

27177.5.

A towing service may be maintained by a bridge and highway district on each vehicular crossing under its jurisdiction, and said district may furnish such towing and emergency road service as is necessary to permit the orderly flow of traffic upon such crossing and upon district property. The district may prescribe and collect reasonable rates for towing and other services furnished. When any vehicle or object on any vehicular crossing or road under district jurisdiction or upon district property upon which towing service is maintained is stopped for any reason and such vehicle or object is obstructing or may obstruct traffic, the district shall order that such vehicle or object be towed by the towing service either to the nearest property of the bridge and highway district designated for the parking or storing of vehicles, or to a suitable parking location on a public street or highway and thereupon left in the custody of the owner or operator of such vehicle or object, or his agent, or, in the event no such owner, operator, or agent is present, or if such owner, operator, or agent so requests, to a public garage or off-street parking facility. The district may prescribe the limits within which the towing service authorized herein shall be operated. The district may furnish and deliver fuel to vehicles, the supply of which is exhausted, or change tires, and may charge a reasonable sum for the services and materials furnished. If the district deems it safe and advisable and the owner or operator of such vehicle or object so requests, it may be towed from the vehicular crossing as herein provided.

The towing service maintained by a district pursuant to this section shall be the only towing service authorized to render service to or remove vehicles or objects which become disabled upon vehicular crossings or property under the jurisdiction of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1054.)
-------------------------------------------

27178.

Within the district, the Department of Transportation may restrict any portion of a state highway to a particular mode of vehicular transportation during such hours as the department, upon the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation, determines such restriction would expedite the flow of traffic.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 125.)
-------------------------------------------

27179.

A bridge and highway district may contract with the State to furnish regular highway patrol officers to serve for 24-hour police or patrol duty on the bridge and its approaches. The cost of such services shall be a legal expense for operation of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Duties of District Officers [27180. - 27189.]

27180.

The president shall sign all contracts on behalf of the district, and perform such other duties as may be imposed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27181.

The secretary shall countersign all contracts on behalf of the district and perform such other duties as may be imposed by the board. The secretary shall devote his full time during office hours to the affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27182.

The auditor under the direction of the board of directors shall install and maintain a system of auditing and accounting which shall completely show the financial condition of the district at all times. He shall draw warrants to pay those claims made against the district which have been approved by the general manager.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 366.)
-------------------------------------------

27183.

The engineer, under the direction of the general manager, shall have full charge of the constructions and of the works of the district. No person shall serve or act as engineer unless he is a licensed civil engineer under the laws of this State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1861.)
-------------------------------------------

27184.

The attorney shall have full charge of the legal matters pertaining to the district, and shall be the legal adviser to the board, the general manager, and all of the officers of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27185.

The board shall designate a bank or a savings and loan association of good standing, or both, as a depositary for district funds. The board may also designate other banks or savings and loan associations as branch depositaries. Any depositary and each branch depositary shall give security sufficient to secure the district against possible loss, and in the case of active deposits shall pay the warrants drawn by the auditor for demands against the district under such rules as the board may prescribe.

The board may also deposit all or part of the funds of the district in the State Treasury, and the State Treasurer shall receive any district funds sent to him for deposit and pay out said funds upon warrants of the district, under such rules as the board may prescribe. Boards and district officials conforming to the provisions of this section are not required to conform to the provisions of Chapters 4 (commencing with Section 16500) or 4.5 (commencing with Section 16600) of Part 2, Division 4, Title 2, of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

27186.

The general manager, secretary, auditor, engineer, and attorney, and any other officers or employees of the district who may be required to do so by the board, shall give such bonds to the district, conditioned upon the faithful performance of their duties, as the board may prescribe. When deemed expedient by the board a master official bond may be used which shall provide coverage on more than one officer or employee who is required by the board to give bond. Such bond shall be in the form and for the term which is approved by the board and shall inure to the benefit of the district by whom such officer or employee is employed as well as the officer under whom the employee serves.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1592.)
-------------------------------------------

27187.

After the organization of the district the board, the general manager, and all of the other officers of the district shall prepare plans, both engineering and financial, for the purpose of putting into operation the project for which the district has been organized, and secure the necessary data, contracts, agreements, plans and specifications for the prosecution of such work as will enable them to put the matter before the voters at an election held for the purpose of authorizing the issuance of bonds by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27188.

The board of directors shall, for the protection of a bridge and highway district, insure any bridge or other facility constructed or acquired under the provisions of this act against all risks to such extent as it deems necessary. In case of damage or destruction, the proceeds of such insurance shall be applied to the restoration of such bridge or facility. Any such bridge or facility may be insured, irrespective of the retirement of all indebtedness incurred for its construction or acquisition, and the cost of such insurance shall be paid from any funds available to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 304.)
-------------------------------------------

27189.

In cases of great emergency, including but not limited to states of emergency as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 8558 of the Government Code, the board of directors of a bridge and highway district may proceed at once to replace or repair any and all structures, roadway, or property of the district that may be rendered unusable or unsafe without adopting the plans, specifications, strain sheets or working details or giving notice for bids to let contracts. The work may be done by day labor under the direction of the board, by contract, or by a combination of the two. If the work is done wholly or in part by contract, the contractor shall be paid the actual cost of the use of machinery and tools and of material and labor expended by him in doing the work, plus not more than 15 percent to cover all profits, supervision, and other expenses. No more than the lowest current market prices shall be paid for materials. Not less than the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for work of a similar character in the locality in which the work is performed, fixed as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, shall be paid to all workmen employed on such works.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 618.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.5. Claims [27190. - 27190.]

27190.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.6. Annual Audit of the District [27195. - 27196.]

27195.

(a) The district shall contract with a certified public accountant or public accountant to make an annual audit, the scope and content of which shall be prescribed by such accountant, of the books, accounts, records, papers, money, and securities of the district.

(b) Such report shall include a statement as to whether or not the accountant, through the application of auditing tests and other auditing procedures, is satisfied that expenditures and claims were supported by proper documentation and were properly recorded.

(c) All costs of the audit shall be borne by the district.

(d) A copy of each year’s audit shall be sent to the county auditor of each county within the district for public inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

27196.

The accountant who is under contract to perform the audit provided for in Section 27195 may at any reasonable time and place examine the books and records of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1472.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Taxation for Preliminary District Expenses [27200. - 27206.]

27200.

No taxes shall be levied under the provisions of this chapter for the purpose of carrying out new projects undertaken by the district after the original project for which the district was formed has been completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27201.

During July of each year the board shall determine the amount of money required by the district which must be raised by taxation, and shall fix a rate of taxation which will raise that amount. If the purpose of the taxation is to supply funds for investigating the project prior to the issuance of bonds and the payment of the officers and employees of the district prior to the time when the works of the district are earning revenue the tax rate shall not exceed ten cents ($0.10) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27202.

All running expenses of the district prior to the time the works of the district are earning revenue, being a part of the cost of constructing or acquiring or both the works, may be paid from the proceeds of any bonds issued by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27203.

Within a reasonable time prior to the time that the boards of supervisors of the counties having any portion of their territory within the boundaries of the district are required by law to fix their tax rates, the board shall certify to the board of supervisors of each of the said counties the rate of taxation fixed for district purposes and at the time and in the manner required by law for the levying of taxes for county purposes each shall levy and collect a tax for district purposes in addition to any other tax levied by such board of supervisors at the rate certified by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27204.

All county officers charged with the duty of collecting taxes shall collect district taxes at the same time and in the same form and manner as county taxes are collected, and when collected pay the proceeds to the district. The appropriate county officers shall pay the taxes collected for the district to the secretary of the district who shall deposit them in the district depositary or in the State Treasury to the credit of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27205.

Taxes levied by the board of supervisors of a county for the benefit of the district shall be a lien upon all property within the district, and shall have the same force and effect as other liens for taxes. Their collection may be enforced in the same manner as liens for county taxes are enforced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27206.

If during the month of July next preceding the expiration of the time estimated for the construction of the works it shall appear to the board that the construction of the works may be delayed beyond the time so estimated the board shall estimate the period of such delay and cause a tax to be levied and collected in accordance with the provisions of this chapter which shall be sufficient to produce the amount required to pay one year’s interest on the bonds or, if the estimated period of delay will be less than one year, the amount required to pay the interest which will accrue on the bonds during such estimated period of delay.

The amount of any such tax shall be reduced to the extent that the district has funds on hand and available for the purpose of paying such interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Authority for Issuance and Sale of District Bonds [27220. - 27229.]

27220.

Whenever the board deems it necessary for the district to incur a bonded indebtedness it shall, by resolution so declare. The resolution shall contain:

(a) A statement of the proposition to be submitted to the electors, including the purpose for which the proposed debt is to be incurred.

(b) The amount of debt to be incurred, which shall not exceed 15 per cent of the assessed value of all taxable property in the district.

(c) The maximum term, which shall not exceed 40 years, that the bonds proposed to be issued shall run before maturity.

(d) The maximum rate of interest to be paid, which shall not exceed 6 per cent per annum.

(e) A statement that interest, to be paid upon such bonds, during the period of construction of the works of the district and before any revenue is obtained therefrom shall be a capital charge, and shall be payable out of the principal sum realized from the sale of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27221.

The board shall fix a date upon which a special election shall be held for the purpose of authorizing the bonded indebtedness to be incurred and shall provide for holding the election on the date so fixed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27222.

The board shall give notice of the holding of the election.

The notice shall:

(a) Refer to the resolution adopted by the board calling the election.

(b) Specify the precincts or consolidated precincts in each county or portion of a county which are adopted for the purposes of the election.

(c) Designate the location of the balloting places, and the names of the officers selected to conduct the election, who shall consist of one inspector and two judges in each precinct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27223.

The notice shall be published for two weeks in at least one newspaper and not more than three newspapers designated by the board, which are published in each county or portion of a county within the district. The notice as published in each county shall contain only the reference to the precincts, polling places and election officers in the county or portion of the county in which it is published.

If there is no newspaper published in any county the notice shall be posted in three public places in that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27224.

All the expenses of holding the election shall be borne by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27225.

The returns of the election shall be made and the votes canvassed by the board within 30 days after the holding of the election, and the results thereof designated and declared in accordance with the general election laws of the State in so far as they may be applicable, and except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

As soon as the result is declared the secretary shall enter a statement of the results in the records of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27226.

If more than two-thirds of the votes cast at the election are in favor of incurring the indebtedness, the board may by resolution at any time it deems proper provide for the form and execution of the bonds, and for the issuance of any part thereof, and may sell or dispose of the bonds so issued at such times or in such manner either for cash in lawful money of the United States, or its equivalent as it may deem to be to the public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27227.

All bonds issued by the district shall be legal investments for savings banks, and shall have the same force and effect and shall be equivalent to bonds issued by any municipality, and shall be exempt from all taxation within this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27229.

Whenever the board deems it necessary or advisable to refund any outstanding bonds, it may, by resolution, declare such necessity or advisability and outline a general plan of refunding, including the issuance of refunding bonds and the terms and conditions thereof.

Upon adopting a general plan of refunding, the board shall, by resolution, provide for submitting to the qualified electors of the district the proposition of whether the refunding bonds shall issue. The resolution shall provide for the manner of submitting the proposition to the electors, and shall state the purpose of the refunding, the terms and conditions of the bonds, and any other facts essential for the information of the electors. The election held on the proposition shall conform to the provisions of this article.

If the proposition is favorably voted upon, the board of directors has plenary power in the matter of executing the bonds and providing for their sale and disposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 543.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Issuance of District Bonds and Disposition of Surplus Proceeds [27240. - 27250.]

27240.

At or before the time of issuing any bonds the board shall estimate:

(a) The total cost of constructing or acquiring or both the works for which the bonds are to be issued.

(b) The period of construction of such works.

(c) The amount of bonds which will be required to pay the total estimated cost and to pay interest on the bonds during the estimated period of construction and for six months thereafter.

No bonds shall be issued if the estimated amount of bonds required to pay the estimated cost and interest exceeds the total amount of bonds authorized to be issued by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27241.

If the estimated amount of bonds required to pay the estimated cost and interest exceeds the total amount of bonds theretofore authorized, the board may submit to the electors of the district the proposition of authorizing additional bonds for the purpose of meeting the estimate. No error or informality in any estimate shall invalidate any bonds of the distirct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27242.

Bonds may be issued in accordance with the estimate in such amounts not exceeding the total amount of bonds authorized as will produce a sum sufficient to pay the cost of constructing or acquiring or both the works for which they were authorized and interest on the bonds so issued during the period of construction and six months thereafter. The failure to issue the full amount of bonds authorized shall not invalidate any bonds of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27243.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds the board may issue temporary bonds of any denomination and with or without coupons and subject to the same restrictions imposed upon the issuance of definitive bonds. Temporary bonds shall be exchangeable for definitive bonds upon the issuance of the latter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27244.

If, after any bond has been duly signed by any properly authorized officer, that officer ceases to hold office, the bond may nevertheless be delivered with the same effect as if it had been signed by the person holding the office at the time of delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27245.

The district bonds may be made registerable as to principal alone or as to both principal and interest under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the board prior to the issuance thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27247.

If after paying the cost of constructing or acquiring or both the works and interest on the bonds during the actual period of construction and for a period of six months thereafter, there is a surplus of the proceeds of the bonds issued by the district, including all premiums paid there shall be set aside out of such surplus in a reserve interest fund an amount equal to one year’s interest on the bonds, or, if the surplus shall be less than one year’s interest on the bonds, all of the surplus shall be set aside.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27248.

The money in the reserve interest fund shall be deposited in the same manner as other funds of the district or invested in securities which are legal investments for public funds, and the fund shall be used solely for the payment of interest on such bonds whenever there shall be a deficit in the revenues of the works and only to the extent of such deficit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27249.

If the surplus from the proceeds of the bonds exceeds one year’s interest on the bonds, the balance shall be placed in the fund for the payment of the principal of such bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27250.

A district formed under this part may issue either general obligation bonds or revenue bonds secured solely by tolls.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1592.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Rights of Way for District Works [27260. - 27262.]

27260.

The board may construct works across any stream, strait, bay, water course, street, avenue, highway, railway, canal, ditch, or flume which the route of the works may intersect or cross. The works may also be constructed along any street, avenue, or highway, if they are constructed so as to afford security for life and property. The board shall restore the crossings and intersections as nearly as possible to their former state or in a manner not to have impaired unnecessarily their usefulness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27261.

Every person, city or county or public corporation whose right of way is intersected or crossed by the works of the district shall cooperate with the board in forming such intersection or crossing, and grant the necessary rights of way therefor. The district shall pay the necessary expenses of any intersection and damages to any public corporation, city or county or abutting property owner for expenses caused by the construction of the works of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27262.

The necessary right of way is hereby given, dedicated and set apart to the district to locate, construct and maintain works over and through any of the lands which are the property of this State, including highways, and to have the same rights and privileges appertaining thereto that are granted to cities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Toll Charges [27280. - 27282.]

27280.

The board shall fix all tolls for the use of the facilities of travel constructed by the district, and shall collect such tolls through the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27281.

The general manager shall furnish the board with an estimate of the tolls necessary to pay the obligations of the district. The board shall, upon the recommendation of the general manager, or such modifications thereof as it may adopt, fix such tolls as will:

(a) First, pay the operating expenses of the district.

(b) Second, provide for repairs and maintenance of works owned or operated by the district, including any payments to be made into a replacement fund for buses and ferries.

(c) Third, provide for the purchase, lease, or other acquisition of district equipment, supplies, and other properties, including provision for interest, sinking funds, reserve funds, or other funds required for the payment of any obligations incurred by the district for the acquisition of such properties.

(d) Fourth, pay any indebtedness or lien that may exist against the district or any of its property or revenues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1381.)
-------------------------------------------

27282.

The board may fix tolls for travel in one direction only on a facility of travel constructed by the district, with no tolls collected for travel in the other direction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1472.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. Disposition and Maintenance of Adequate District Revenues [27300. - 27305.]

27300.

The board may in each fiscal year set aside in separate funds out of the revenues of the works a sufficient sum to:

(a) First, pay the operating expenses of the district.

(b) Second, provide for repairs and maintenance of the works owned or operated by the district, including any payments to be made into a replacement fund for buses and ferries.

(c) Third, provide for the purchase, lease, or other acquisition of district equipment, supplies, and other properties, including provision for interest, sinking funds, reserve funds, or other funds required for the payment of any obligations incurred by the district for the acquisition of such properties.

(d) Fourth, pay any indebtedness or lien that may exist against the district or any of its property or revenues.

The revenues of the works are hereby pledged to the aforesaid purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1381.)
-------------------------------------------

27301.

For the purpose of paying the principal or interest of bonds due or to become due within four months, and not otherwise adequately provided for, the district may borrow money in anticipation of the receipt of either the revenues and taxes of the fiscal year in which the loan is made or the revenues and taxes of the next succeeding fiscal year. The money borrowed shall be payable not later than the end of such next succeeding fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27304.

After the completion of construction of the works, the board shall, in the month of July in each year, cause a tax to be levied and collected in the manner provided in Chapter 11 of this part. The amount of such tax, after deducting any available and applicable moneys on hand (exclusive of moneys in the reserve interest fund) and the estimated amount of revenues of the works for the ensuing 12 months, which estimated amount shall not exceed the actual revenues for the preceding 12 months or, if the works have not been in operation for as long as 12 months, not to exceed an amount computed on the basis of the average daily revenues for the lesser period, shall be sufficient to produce the sums required to be set aside into separate funds by Section 27300, as well as any deficit in such funds and the principal and interest of any outstanding revenue and tax anticipation notes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27305.

The taxes required to be levied and collected under this chapter shall be in addition to all other taxes levied for county purposes, and all taxable property of the district shall be and remain liable to be taxed as provided in this chapter until the entire principal and interest of the bonded indebtedness of the district has been paid in full.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 17. Annexation of Territory [27320. - 27325.]

27320.

Any county or any portion thereof may be added to the district at any time, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter by resolution of the board upon request of the board of supervisors of the county by an ordinance applying for permission for the county or portion thereof to become a part of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27321.

If the annexation of any county or portion thereof is proposed to any district already organized the board shall prescribe the terms upon which the territory proposed to be annexed shall be admitted, including the payment of a just proportion of the organization and preliminary expenses originally incurred by the district. No county or portion thereof shall be annexed without first complying with those terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

27322.
